src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s36x2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - svíkja: # 
    svíkja+V+Inf: svíkja
    svíkja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: svíkur
    svíkja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sveik
    svíkja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sviku
    svíkja+V+Sup: svikið
